en: Fourme de Montbrison cheese
fr: Fourme de Montbrison
hr: Sir fourme de montbrison
ja: フルム・ド・モンブリゾン

en: Roquefort cheeses, Roquefort cheeses from ewe's milk
bg: Рокфор
de: Roquefort-Käse
es: Queso roquefort
fr: Roqueforts, Roquefort
hr: Roquefort sirevi
it: Formaggio Roquefort
ja: ロックフォール

en: Bresse blue cheese from cow's milk
fr: Fromage bleu de Bresse

en: Bresse blue cheese from cow's milk reduced fat around 15% fat
fr: Fromage bleu de Bresse allegé environ 15% MG

en: Gorgonzolas
xx: Gorgonzola
bg: Горгондзола
de: Gorgonzola
es: Gorgonzola
fi: gorgonzolat
fr: Gorgonzolas
hr: Gorgonzola
hu: Gorgonzola
it: Gorgonzola
ja: ゴルゴンゾーラ
nl: Gorgonzolas, Gorgonzola

fr: gorgonzola et mascarpone
it: gorgonzola e mascarpone

en: Cow cheeses, Cheeses from cow milk
bg: Краве сирене и кашкавал
ca: Formatge de llet de vaca
da: ost fra komælk
de: Kuhmilchkäse, Käse aus Kuhmilch
el: αγελαδινό τυρί
es: Quesos de vaca, Quesos De Leche De Vaca
fi: Lehmänmaitojuustot
fr: Fromages de vache, fromages au lait de vache
he: גבינות פרה, גבינות מחלב פרה
hr: Kravlji sirevi
hu: Tehén sajt
it: Formaggio vaccino
ja: 牛乳で作られたチーズ
lt: Sūriai iš karvių pieno
nl: Koemelkkazen, Koemelkkaas
pl: Ser krowi, Sery na bazie mleka krowiego
pt: Queijos de vaca, Queijos com leite de vaca
ru: сыр из коровьего молока
sr: крављи сир
th: ชีสจากนมวัว
tr: İnek peynirleri
zh: 牛乳奶酪

en: Provolone
xx: Provolone
bg: Проволоне
de: Provolone
es: Provolone
fi: Provolone
fr: Provolone
hr: Provolone
it: Provolone
ja: プロヴォローネ, プロボローネ
nl: Provolone
pt: Provolone
sv: Provolone

en: Smoked provolone
fr: Provolone fumé

en: Coulommiers, Coulommiers cheese from cow's milk
xx: Coulommiers
bg: Куломие
fr: Coulommiers
hr: Coulommiers
hu: Coulommiers sajt

en: Soumaintrain
xx: Soumaintrain
de: Soumaintrain
fr: Soumaintrain
nl: Soumaintrain

en: Soft-ripened round cheese with bloomy rind around 11% fat Coulommiers-type cheese reduced fat
fr: Fromage rond à pâte molle et croûte fleurie environ 11% MG type coulommiers allégé en matière grasse

en: Bries
xx: Brie
bg: Бри
de: Brie
es: Brie
fi: Brie-juustot
fr: Bries, pointes de brie, pointes de bries, pointe de bries, pointe de brie, brie
hr: Brie
it: Brie
ja: ブリーチーズ
nl: Bries, Brie
pl: Sery Brie, ser Brie

en: Saint-Félicien cheese
fr: Saint-Félicien
hr: Sir saint-félicien
it: Formaggio Saint-Félicien
nl: Saint-Félicien

en: Cheddar cheese, Cheddar
bg: Чедър
de: Cheddar
es: Queso Cheddar, Cheddar
fi: cheddarjuusto
fr: Cheddars, Cheddar
he: גבינת צ׳דר
hr: Cheddar sir
hu: Cheddar sajt
it: Formaggio cheddar
ja: チェダーチーズ
lt: Angliški sūriai
nl: Cheddars, Cheddar
pl: Cheddar, Ser Cheddar
pt: Qiejos cheddar
tr: Çedar peyniri

en: Mature cheddar
de: Reifer Cheddar, Gereifter Cheddar
fr: Cheddar mûr
hr: Zreli cheddar
hu: Érett Ceddar sajt
nl: Rijpe cheddars, Rijpe cheddar

en: Extra-mature cheddar
de: Extra Reifer Cheddar
fr: Cheddar extra-mature
hr: Ekstra zreli cheddar
hu: Extra érett ceddar sajt
nl: Extra-rijpe cheddar

en: Mild cheddar
de: Milder Cheddar, Junger Cheddar
fi: mieto cheddar
fr: Cheddar doux
hr: Blagi cheddar
nl: Milde cheddar

en: Cheddar slices
de: Cheddar in Scheiben
es: Lonchas de queso Cheddar
fi: Cheddar-siivut
fr: Cheddar en tranches
hr: Kriške cheddara
hu: Szeletelt cheddar sajt
it: Fette di cheddar
nl: Cheddarplakken

en: Mimolette cheese
bg: Мимолет
de: Mimolette
fr: Mimolettes, vieux Hollande, boule de Lille
hr: Mimolet sir
hu: Mimolettes sajtok
it: formaggio Mimolette
ja: ミモレット
nl: Mimolettes, Commissiekazen